Maine, session 132, LD2228.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-G, sub-§10-E, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 593, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §12004-G, sub-§29-D, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 366, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§74-H, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 316, §1 and
affected by §5, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA c. 437, headnote is amended to read:
CHAPTER 437
STATE EDUCATION AND EMPLOYMENT OUTCOMES TASK FORCE
EDUCATIONAL OUTCOME DATABASE
Sec. 5. 20-A MRSA §12901, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 593, §2, is repealed.
Sec. 6. 20-A MRSA §12902, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 243, §1, is amended
to read:
No later than January 1, 2022, and biennially thereafter, the Department of Labor, in
consultation with the Department of Education and the task force, shall update the
educational outcome database. For the purposes of this section, "educational outcome
database" means the Department of Labor's educational outcome database, which includes
but is not limited to information and data on education results, program completion,
graduation, credentials earned and employment and earnings outcomes for graduates of
postsecondary educational institutions in the State over time.
Sec. 7. 32 MRSA §7352, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 316, §3 and affected
by §5, is repealed.
Page 1 - 132LR3062(03)

Sec. 8. 32 MRSA §7353, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 316, §3 and affected
by §5, is repealed.
Sec. 9. 32 MRSA c. 86, sub-c. 3, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 10. 32 MRSA §8103, sub-§1-A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 366, §9, is
repealed.
Sec. 11. 32 MRSA §8103-A, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 366, §16, is repealed.
Sec. 12. 32 MRSA §8116, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2011, c. 366, §49, is further
amended to read:
3. Rules. The chief with the advice of the board may adopt rules necessary to
administer this chapter, including, but not limited to, rules regarding standards of
acceptable professional conduct and training requirements for and sponsorship of
investigative assistants. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical
rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 13. 32 MRSA §8124, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2015, c. 295, §1, is amended
to read:
The home address and home telephone number of a professional investigator or
investigative assistant obtained by the State under this chapter are confidential and may not
be disclosed by the board except by written consent of the subject of the information, by
court order, for criminal justice purposes or for permitting purposes by law enforcement
agencies or permitting authorities.
Sec. 14. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LEGISLATURE
Legislature 0081
Initiative: Deappropriates the Legislature's funding for the eliminated State Education and
Employment Outcomes Task Force.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $0 ($880)
All Other $0 ($1,620)
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 ($2,500)
Page 2 - 132LR3062(03)